Hawaii statutes.
§287-3 Furnishing of operating
records. (a) The traffic violations bureaus of the district courts, upon
request, shall furnish any person a certified abstract of the bureaus' record,
if any, of any person relating to all alleged moving violations and any
convictions resulting therefrom, arising from the operation of a motor vehicle
and any administrative license revocation pursuant to chapter 291E, part III
and chapter 286, part XIV, as it was in effect on or before December 31, 2001.
The traffic violations bureaus may collect a fee, not to exceed $20, of which
$18 shall be deposited into the general fund and $2 shall be deposited into the
judiciary computer system special fund.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision to the
contrary, all alleged moving violations as well as any convictions resulting
therefrom or any administrative license suspension pursuant to chapter 291A
shall not be included in a certified abstract of the bureaus' record. [L 1949,
c 393, pt of §1; RL 1955, §160-82; HRS §287-3; am L 1980, c 84, pt of §1; am L
1982, c 210, §2; am L Sp 1991, c 1, §16; am L 1993, c 135, §2; am L 1994, c 73,
§1; am L 1996, c 203, §§3, 9; am L 1999, c 299, §1; am L 2001, c 157, §9; am L
2010, c 64, §1]

Case Notes

Based on the clear language of subsection (a) and
§291-3.3(b), and because §291-3.3(b) does not describe a "moving
violation" which arises from the "operation of a motor vehicle",
the district court disregarded the statutory requirements and abused its
discretion in determining that a violation of §291-3.3(b) was properly included
as part of defendant's traffic abstract. 123 H. 293 (App.), 233 P.3d 713
(2010).

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next